Vermont, session 2025-2026, H570.
It is hereby enacted by the General Assembly of the State of Vermont:
Sec. 1. 21 V.S.A. chapter 5, subchapter 3 is redesignated to read:
Subchapter 3. Minimum Wages and Overtime Pay
Sec. 2. 21 V.S.A. § 384 is amended to read:
§ 384. EMPLOYMENT; WAGES
* * *
(b) Notwithstanding subsection (a) of this section, an employer shall not
pay an employee less than one and one-half times the regular wage rate for any
work done by the employee in excess of 40 hours during a workweek eight
hours for any workday nor less than twice the employee’s regular wage rate for
VT LEG #386021 v.1

BILL AS INTRODUCED H.570
2026 Page 2 of 2
any work done by the employee in excess of 12 hours for any workday.
However, this subsection shall not apply to:
* * *
Sec. 3. EFFECTIVE DATE
This act shall take effect on January 1, 2027.
VT LEG #386021 v.1